North Dakota, session 69, HB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Out - of - pocket expenses - Prescription drugs .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Cost-sharing" means any coinsurance, copayment, or deductible under a health benefit
plan.
b. "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to prescription drug coverage under a health
benefit plan.
c. "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided under section 26.1 - 36.3 - 01 .
d. "Prescription drug" means a drug for which a prescription is required:
(1) Without a generic equivalent; or
(2) With a generic equivalent, if the enrollee has obtained access to the drug through
prior authorization, a step therapy protocol, or the heath care insurer's expectations
and appeals process.
2. To the extent permitted by federal law and regulation, an insurer may not deliver, issue,
execute, or renew a health benefit plan providing prescription drug coverage unless when
calculating an enrollee's overall contribution to any ou t - o f - pocket maximum or any
cos t - sharing requirement for a prescription drug under the health benefit plan, the health
benefit plan provides for the inclusion of any amount paid by the enrollee or paid on behalf of
the enrollee by another person. The health benefit plan may not vary the ou t - o f - pocke t
maximum or cos t - sharing requirement, or otherwise design benefits accounting for the
availability of a cos t - sharing assistance program for a prescription drug .
3. If application of this section would result in ineligibility of a health benefit plan that is a qualified
high-deductible health plan to qualify as a health savings account under section 223 of the
Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 223], the requirements of this section do not apply with
respect to the deductible of the health benefit plan until after the enrollee has satisfied the
minimum deductible under section 26 U.S.C. 223.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-36.6-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1216 - PAGE 2
26.1-36.6-03. Self-insurance health plans - Requirements. (Effective through July 31, 2025)
1. The following policy provisions apply to a self-insurance health plan or to the administrative
services only or third-party administrator, and are subject to the jurisdiction of the
commissioner: sections 26.1-36-03, 26.1-36-03.1, 26.1-36-05, 26.1-36-10, 26.1-36-12,
26.1-36-12.4, 26.1-36-12.6, 26.1-36-13, 26.1-36-14, 26.1-36-17, 26.1-36-18, 26.1-36-19,
26.1-36-23, 26.1-36-29, 26.1-36-37.1, 26.1-36-38, 26.1-36-39, 26.1-36-41, 26.1-36-44, and
26.1-36-46.
2. The following health benefit provisions applicable to a group accident and health insurance
policy under chapter 26.1-36 apply to a self-insurance health plan and are subject to the
jurisdiction of the commissioner: sections 26.1-36-06, 26.1-36-06.1, 26.1-36-07, 26.1-36-08,
26.1-36-08.1, 26.1-36-09, 26.1-36-09.1, 26.1-36-09.2, 26.1-36-09.3, 26.1-36-09.5,
26.1-36-09.6, 26.1-36-09.7, 26.1-36-09.8, 26.1-36-09.9, 26.1-36-09.10, 26.1-36-09.11,
26.1-36-09.12, 26.1-36-09.13, 26.1-36-09.14, 26.1-36-09.15, 26.1-36-11, 26.1-36-12.2,
26.1-36-20, 26.1-36-21, 26.1-36-22, 26.1-36-23.1, and 26.1-36-43. Section 54-52.1-04.18
applies to a self-insurance health plan and is subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.
Self-insurance health plans - Requirements. (Effective after July 31, 2025)
1. The following policy provisions apply to a self-insurance health plan or to the administrative
services only or third-party administrator, and are subject to the jurisdiction of the
commissioner: sections 26.1-36-03, 26.1-36-03.1, 26.1-36-05, 26.1-36-10, 26.1-36-12,
26.1-36-12.4, 26.1-36-12.6, 26.1-36-13, 26.1-36-14, 26.1-36-17, 26.1-36-18, 26.1-36-19,
26.1-36-23, 26.1-36-29, 26.1-36-37.1, 26.1-36-38, 26.1-36-39, 26.1-36-41, 26.1-36-44, and
26.1-36-46.
2. The following health benefit provisions applicable to a group accident and health insurance
policy under chapter 26.1-36 apply to a self-insurance health plan and are subject to the
jurisdiction of the commissioner: sections 26.1-36-06, 26.1-36-06.1, 26.1-36-07, 26.1-36-08,
26.1-36-08.1, 26.1-36-09, 26.1-36-09.1, 26.1-36-09.2, 26.1-36-09.3, 26.1-36-09.5,
26.1-36-09.6, 26.1-36-09.7, 26.1-36-09.8, 26.1-36-09.9, 26.1-36-09.10, 26.1-36-09.11,
26.1-36-09.12, 26.1-36-09.13, 26.1-36-09.14, 26.1-36-09.15, 26.1-36-11, 26.1-36-12.2,
26.1-36-20, 26.1-36-21, 26.1-36-22, 26.1-36-23.1, and 26.1-36-43. Section 1 of this Act
applies to a self-insurance health plan and is subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. This Act applies effective January 1, 2026, to the public employees
retirement system uniform group insurance program health insurance benefits coverage, regardless of
the health insurance benefits coverage contract issuance or renewal date. This Act applies effective
January 1, 2026, or upon the next renewal after January 1, 2026, to health benefit plans.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.

H. B. NO. 1216 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1216.
House Vote: Yeas 56 Nays 37 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 29 Nays 18 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State